Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,103
Act, how construed.

The Weights and Measures Act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate the general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which have enacted corresponding provisions.

Laws 1972, LB 1413, § 21;

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 34.